Washington statutes.
RCW 9.95.440

Offenders—Reinstatement of release.

In the event the board suspends the release status of an offender released under RCW 9.95.420, * 10.95.030(3), or 9.94A.730 by reason of an alleged violation of a condition of release, or pending disposition of a new criminal charge, the board may nullify the suspension order and reinstate release under previous conditions or any new conditions the board determines advisable under RCW 9.94A.704. Before the board may nullify a suspension order and reinstate release, it shall determine that the best interests of society and the offender shall be served by such reinstatement rather than return to confinement.

[ 2014 c 130 s 8; 2008 c 231 s 45; 2003 c 218 s 6; 2001 2nd sp.s. c 12 s 310.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 10.95.030 was amended by 2023 c 102 s 20, changing subsection (3) to subsection (2).

Application—Effective date—2014 c 130: See notes following RCW 9.94A.510.

Intent—Application—Application of repealers—Effective date—2008 c 231: See notes following RCW 9.94A.701.

Severability—2008 c 231: See note following RCW 9.94A.500.

Intent—Severability—Effective dates—2001 2nd sp.s. c 12: See notes following RCW 71.09.250.

Application—2001 2nd sp.s. c 12 ss 301-363: See note following RCW 9.94A.030.